North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 1. Municipal Hospitals.

§ 131E-5.
Title and purpose.

This Part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Hospital Act.”

The purpose of this Part is to authorize municipalities to construct, operate and maintain hospitals and other facilities which furnish hospital, clinical and similar services to the people of this State. It is also the purpose of this Part to authorize municipalities to cooperate with other public and private agencies and with each other. Additionally, it is the purpose of this Part to authorize municipalities to accept assistance from State and federal agencies and from other sources.

This Part provides an additional and alternative method for municipalities to establish facilities that furnish hospital, clinical and similar services. This Part shall not be regarded as repealing any powers now existing under any other law, either general, special or local.

This Part shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Advisory Commission on Hospital Infection Control and Disclosure.

Pursuant to Session Laws 2011-266, ss. 2 and 2.4, the statutory requirements of the Advisory Commission on Hospital Infection Control and Disclosure, established by S.L. 2007-480, have been met and this body is no longer authorized to meet, provide recommendations, or operate in any capacity.

§ 131E-6.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“City”, as defined in

G.S. 160A-1(2)

, means a municipal corporation organized under the laws of this State for the better government of the people within its jurisdiction and having the powers, duties, privileges, and immunities conferred by law on cities, towns, and villages. The term “city” does not include counties or municipal corporations organized for a special purpose under any statute or law. The word “city” is interchangeable with the words “town” and “village” and shall mean any city as defined in this subdivision without regard to the terminology employed in charters, local acts, other portions of the General Statutes, or local customary usage.

“Community general hospital” means a short-term nonfederal hospital that provides diagnostic and therapeutic services to patients for a variety of medical conditions, both surgical and nonsurgical, such services being available for use primarily by residents of the community in which it is located.

“Corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina” means any of the following:

A corporation for profit or having a capital stock which is created and organized under Chapter 55 of the General Statutes or any other general or special act of this State.

A foreign corporation which has procured a certificate of authority to transact business in this State pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

A limited liability company formed under Chapter 57D of the General Statutes.

A foreign limited liability company that has procured a certificate of authority to transact business in this State pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 57D of the General Statutes.

“Hospital facility” means any one or more buildings, structures, additions, extensions, improvements or other facilities, whether or not located on the same site or sites, machinery, equipment, furnishings or other real or personal property suitable for health care or medical care; and includes, without limitation, general hospitals; chronic disease, maternity, mental, tuberculosis and other specialized hospitals; nursing homes, including skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities; adult care homes for the aged and disabled; public health center facilities; housing or quarters for local public health departments; facilities for intensive care and self-care; clinics and outpatient facilities; clinical, pathological and other laboratories; health care research facilities; laundries; residences and training facilities for nurses, interns, physicians and other staff members; food preparation and food service facilities; administrative buildings, central service and other administrative facilities; communication, computer and other electronic facilities; fire-fighting facilities; pharmaceutical and recreational facilities; storage space; X ray, laser, radiotherapy and other apparatus and equipment; dispensaries; utilities; vehicular parking lots and garages; office facilities for hospital staff members and physicians; and such other health and hospital facilities customarily under the jurisdiction of or provided by hospitals, or any combination of the foregoing, with all necessary, convenient or related interests in land, machinery, apparatus, appliances, equipment, furnishings, appurtenances, site preparation, landscaping, and physical amenities.

(4a)

“Hospital land” means air and ground rights to real property held either in fee or by lease by a municipality, with all easements, rights-of-way, appurtenances, landscaping, and physical amenities such as utilities, parking lots, and garages, but excluding other improvements to land described in subsection (4) of this section and G.S. 131E-16(15).

“Municipality” means any county, city, or other political subdivision of this State, or any hospital district created under Part C of this Article.

“Nonprofit association” or “nonprofit corporation” means any association or corporation from which no part of the net earnings inures or may lawfully inure to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1997-233, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 56(a).

§ 131E-7.
General powers.

A municipality shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Part, including the following powers, which are in addition to the powers granted elsewhere in this Part:

To construct, equip, operate, and maintain hospital facilities;

To levy property taxes pursuant to

G.S. 153A-149

or

G.S. 160A-209

and to allocate those and other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law to fund hospital facilities; a hospital district may levy annually a tax on property having a situs in the district under the rules and according to the procedures prescribed in the Machinery Act, Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, Subchapter II, and a hospital district may allocate those and other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law to fund hospital facilities;

To issue bonds and notes pursuant to the Local Government Finance Act, Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, for the financing of hospital facilities;

To use property owned or controlled by the municipality;

To acquire real or personal property, including existing hospital facilities, by purchase, grant, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise;

To establish a fee schedule for services received from hospital facilities and to make services available regardless of ability to pay.

A municipality or a public hospital may contract with or enter into any arrangement with other public hospitals or municipalities of this or other states, the State of North Carolina, federal, or public agencies, or with any person, private organization, or nonprofit corporation or association for the provision of health care. The municipality or public hospital may pay for or contribute its share of the cost of any such contract or arrangement from revenues available for these purposes, including revenues rising from the provision of health care.

Any two or more municipalities may enter into agreements to jointly exercise the powers, privileges, and authorities granted by this Part. These agreements may provide for:

The appointment of a board, composed of representatives of the parties to the agreement, to supervise and manage a hospital facility;

The authority and duties of the board and the compensation of its members;

The proportional share of the costs of acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of hospital facilities;

The duration, amendment, and termination of the agreement and the disposition of property on termination of the agreement; and

Any other matters as necessary.

A municipality may lease any hospital facility, or part, to a nonprofit association on terms and conditions consistent with the purposes of this Part. The municipality will determine the length of the lease. No lease executed under this subsection shall be deemed to convey a freehold interest.

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

In addition to the general and special powers conferred by this Part, a municipality is authorized to exercise powers necessary to implement the powers under this Part.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 529, s. 5.3; 1995, c. 509, s. 71.

§ 131E-7.1.
Public hospitals’ managed care development authorized.

A public hospital as defined in G.S. 159-39(a) may acquire an ownership interest, in whole or in part, in a nonprofit or for-profit managed care company, including a health maintenance organization, physician hospital organization, physician organization, management services organization, or preferred provider organization with which the public hospital is also directly or indirectly a contracting provider. Ownership interest may be evidenced by the ownership or acquired by the purchase of stock. This ownership or acquisition of stock is the exercise of a health care function and is not the investment of idle funds within the meaning of

G.S. 159-30

and G.S.159-39(g).

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 713, s. 1.

§ 131E-8.
Sale of hospital facilities to nonprofit corporations.

A municipality as defined in

G.S. 131E-6(5)

or hospital authority as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14), upon such terms and conditions as it deems wise, with or without monetary consideration, may sell or convey to a nonprofit corporation organized under Chapter 55A of the General Statutes any rights of ownership the municipality or hospital authority has in a hospital facility including the building, land and equipment associated with the hospital, if the nonprofit corporation is legally committed to continue to operate the facility as a community general hospital open to the general public, free of discrimination based upon race, creed, color, sex or national origin. The nonprofit corporation shall also agree, as a condition of the municipality or hospital authority’s conveying ownership, to provide such services to indigent patients as the municipality or hospital authority and the nonprofit corporation shall agree. The nonprofit corporation shall further agree that should it fail to operate the facility as a community general hospital open to the general public or should the nonprofit corporation dissolve without a successor nonprofit corporation to carry out the terms and conditions of the agreement of conveyance, all ownership rights in the hospital facility, including the building, land and equipment associated with the hospital, shall revert to the municipality or hospital authority or successor entity originally conveying the hospital.

When either general obligation bonds or revenue bonds issued for the benefit of the hospital to be conveyed are outstanding at the time of sale or conveyance, then the nonprofit corporation must agree to the following:

By the effective date of sale or conveyance, the nonprofit corporation shall place into an escrow fund money or direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which, are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America (as approved by the Local Government Commission), the principal of and interest on which, when due and payable, will provide sufficient money to pay the principal of and the interest and redemption premium, if any, on all bonds then outstanding to the maturity date or dates of such bonds or to the date or dates specified for the redemption thereof. The nonprofit corporation shall furnish to the Local Government Commission such evidence as the Commission may require that the securities purchased will satisfy the requirements of this section. A hospital which has placed funds in escrow to retire outstanding general obligation or revenue bonds, as provided in this section, shall not be considered a public hospital, and G.S. 159-39(a)(3) shall be inapplicable to such hospitals.

Any sale or conveyance under this section must be approved by the municipality or hospital authority by a resolution adopted at a regular meeting of the governing body on 10 days’ public notice. Notice shall be given by publication describing the hospital facility to be conveyed, the proposed monetary consideration or lack thereof, and the governing body’s intent to authorize the sale or conveyance.

Neither

G.S. 153A-176

nor Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes shall apply to sales or conveyances pursuant to this section.

A sale or conveyance of substantially all the equipment is a sale or conveyance of hospital facility.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1989, c. 444.

Local Modification.

Richmond: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 597, s. 1.

Cross References.

For section regarding lease or sale of hospital facilities to for-profit corporations by municipalities and hospital authorities, see

G.S. 131E-13

.

For section regarding the lease or sale of hospital facilities to nonprofit corporations, see

G.S. 131E-14

.

§ 131E-8.1.
Maintenance of Health Education Facilities.

This section shall apply to all sales and leases of a hospital facility by a municipality or hospital authority where any portion of the facility was constructed with a capital grant from the Area Health Education Centers Program (AHEC).

The municipality or hospital authority shall give specific notice of intent to sell or lease and of any public hearing to the Director of the local AHEC program and the Director of the AHEC Program at the University of North Carolina School of Medicine at Chapel Hill.

The municipality or hospital authority may provide continued access to the identical or equivalent facilities suitable for continuation of AHEC activities, including all services being provided under the existing operating contract. The municipality or hospital authority may convey all ownership rights in the hospital facility, or any part thereof, to the local AHEC Program without monetary consideration. Further, the municipality or hospital authority may reimburse the local AHEC Program for any funds used for the original construction of any office for AHEC provided by AHEC to establish or continue the hospital facility.

No portion of this section shall be construed to alter rights or obligations of the operating contracts between the hospital facility and AHEC.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1056, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 995.

§ 131E-9.
Governing authority of hospital facilities.

The governing body of a municipality may establish by resolution an office, board, or other municipal agency to plan, establish, construct, maintain, or operate a hospital facility. The resolution shall prescribe the powers, duties, compensation, and tenure of the members of the governing authority. The municipality shall remain responsible for the expenses of planning, establishment, construction, maintenance and operation of the hospital facilities.

The county board of commissioners of a county may establish by resolution a county hospital authority to plan, establish, construct, maintain, or operate a hospital facility. The authority shall be referred to as “ _______________ County Hospital Authority.”

The county hospital authority shall consist of six appointed members and one ex officio member.

The appointed members of the authority shall be appointed by the county board of commissioners. All appointed members shall be residents of the county. Three of the members shall be residents of a city in the county and the remaining three members shall not be residents of the same city or cities in which the other three members appointed under this subdivision reside.

For the initial appointments to the county hospital authority, two of the members shall be appointed for a term of three years, two for a term of four years, and two for a term of five years to achieve staggered terms. All subsequent appointments shall be for five-year terms.

The ex officio member of the county hospital authority shall be a member of the county board of commissioners. The ex officio member’s term on the hospital authority shall be commensurate with his or her term as a member of the county board of commissioners.

When any member of the county hospital authority resigns or is removed from office before the expiration of the member’s term, the county board of commissioners shall appoint a person to serve the unexpired portion of the term.

Any authority vested in a county under this Part or any authority or power that may be exercised by a hospital authority under the Hospital Authorities Act, Chapter 131E, Article 2, Part 2, may be vested by resolution of the county board of commissioners in a county hospital authority established under this section. However, a county hospital authority shall exercise only the powers and duties prescribed in the county board of commissioners’ resolution. The county board of commissioners shall determine in the resolution the compensation, traveling and any other expenses which shall be paid to each member of the county hospital authority. However, the expenses to plan, establish, construct and operate the hospital facility shall remain the responsibility of the county.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Johnston Memorial Hospital: 1995, c. 221, s. 1.

§ 131E-10.
Condemnation.

Every municipality is authorized to condemn property to carry out the purposes of this Part. In condemning property, a municipality shall proceed in the manner provided in Chapter 40A of the General Statutes or in the charter of the municipality. A municipality or its agents is authorized to enter upon land, provided no unnecessary damage is done, to make surveys and examinations relative to any condemnation proceeding. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute or of any applicable municipal charter, the municipality may take possession of property to be condemned at any time after the commencement of the condemnation proceeding. The municipality shall not be precluded from abandonment of the condemnation of property in any case where possession has not taken place.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-11.
Federal and State aid.

Every municipality or nonprofit association is authorized to accept and disburse federal and State moneys, whether made available by grant, loan, gift or devise, to carry out the purposes of this Part. All federal moneys shall be accepted and disbursed upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the United States, if the terms and conditions are consistent with State law. All State moneys shall be accepted and disbursed upon the terms and conditions prescribed by either or both the State and the North Carolina Medical Care Commission. Unless the terms and conditions provide otherwise, the chief financial officer of the municipality shall deposit all moneys received under this section and keep them in separate trust funds.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-12.
Public purposes.

The exercise of the powers, privileges, and authorities conferred on municipalities by this Part are public and government functions, exercised for a public purpose and matters of public necessity. In the case of a county, the exercise of the powers, privileges and authorities conferred by this Part is a county function and purpose, as well as a public and governmental function. In the case of any municipality other than a county, the exercise of the powers, privileges, and authorities conferred by this Part is a municipal function and purpose, as well as a public and governmental function.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-13.
Lease or sale of hospital facilities to or from for-profit or nonprofit corporations or other business entities by municipalities and hospital authorities.

A municipality or hospital authority as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14), may lease, sell, or convey any hospital facility, or part, to a corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina, subject to these conditions, which shall be included in the lease, agreement of sale, or agreement of conveyance:

The corporation shall continue to provide the same or similar clinical hospital services to its patients in medical-surgery, obstetrics, pediatrics, outpatient and emergency treatment, including emergency services for the indigent, that the hospital facility provided prior to the lease, sale, or conveyance. These services may be terminated only as prescribed by Certificate of Need Law prescribed in Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, or, if Certificate of Need Law is inapplicable, by review procedure designed to guarantee public participation pursuant to rules adopted by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.

The corporation shall ensure that indigent care is available to the population of the municipality or area served by the hospital authority at levels related to need, as previously demonstrated and determined mutually by the municipality or hospital authority and the corporation.

The corporation shall not enact financial admission policies that have the effect of denying essential medical services or treatment solely because of a patient’s immediate inability to pay for the services or treatment.

The corporation shall ensure that admission to and services of the facility are available to beneficiaries of governmental reimbursement programs (Medicaid/Medicare) without discrimination or preference because they are beneficiaries of those programs.

The corporation shall prepare an annual report that shows compliance with the requirements of the lease, sale, or conveyance.The corporation shall further agree that if it fails to substantially comply with these conditions, or if it fails to operate the facility as a community general hospital open to the general public and free of discrimination based on race, creed, color, sex, or national origin unless relieved of this responsibility by operation of law, or if the corporation dissolves without a successor corporation to carry out the terms and conditions of the lease, agreement of sale, or agreement of conveyance, all ownership or other rights in the hospital facility, including the building, land and equipment associated with the hospital, shall revert to the municipality or hospital authority or successor entity originally conveying the hospital; provided that any building, land, or equipment associated with the hospital facility that the corporation has constructed or acquired since the sale may revert only upon payment to the corporation of a sum equal to the cost less depreciation of the building, land, or equipment.This section shall not apply to leases, sales, or conveyances of nonmedical services or commercial activities, including the gift shop, cafeteria, the flower shop, or to surplus hospital property that is not required in the delivery of necessary hospital services at the time of the lease, sale, or conveyance.

In the case of a sale or conveyance, if either general obligation bonds or revenue bonds issued for the benefit of the hospital to be conveyed are outstanding at the time of sale or conveyance, then the corporation shall agree to the following:By the effective date of sale or conveyance, the corporation shall place into an escrow fund money or direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which, are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America (as approved by the Local Government Commission), the principal of and interest on which, when due and payable, will provide sufficient money to pay the principal of and the interest and redemption premium, if any, on all bonds then outstanding to the maturity date or dates of such bonds or to the date or dates specified for the redemption thereof. The corporation shall furnish to the Local Government Commission such evidence as the Commission may require that the securities purchased will satisfy the requirements of this section. A hospital which has placed funds in escrow to retire outstanding general obligation or revenue bonds, as provided in this section, shall not be considered a public hospital, and G.S. 159-39(a)(3) shall be inapplicable to such hospitals.No bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be issued by a municipality or hospital authority to finance equipment for or the acquisition, extension, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, or betterment of any hospital facility if the facility has been sold or conveyed to a corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina.

In the case of a lease, the municipality or hospital authority shall determine the length of the lease. No lease executed under this section shall be deemed to convey a freehold interest. Any sublease or assignment of the lease shall be subject to the conditions prescribed by this section. If the term of the lease is more than 10 years, and either general obligation bonds or revenue bonds issued for the benefit of the hospital to be leased are outstanding at the time of the lease, then the corporation shall agree to the following:By the effective date of the lease, the corporation shall place into an escrow fund money or direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which, are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States of America (as approved by the Local Government Commission), the principal of and interest on which, when due and payable, will provide sufficient money to pay the principal of and the interest and redemption premium, if any, on all bonds then outstanding to the maturity date or dates of such bonds or to the date or dates specified for the redemption thereof. The corporation shall furnish to the Local Government Commission such evidence as the Commission may require that the securities purchased will satisfy the requirements of this section.No bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be issued by a municipality or hospital authority to finance equipment for or the acquisition, extension, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, or betterment of any hospital facility when the facility is leased to a corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina.

The municipality or hospital authority shall comply with the following procedures before leasing, selling, or conveying a hospital facility, or part thereof:

The municipality or hospital authority shall first adopt a resolution declaring its intent to sell, lease, or convey the hospital facility at a regular meeting on 10 days’ public notice. Notice shall be given by publication in one or more papers of general circulation in the affected area describing the intent to lease, sell, or convey the hospital facility involved, known potential buyers or lessees, a solicitation of additional interested buyers or lessees and intent to negotiate the terms of the lease or sale. Specific notice, given by certified mail, shall be given to the local office of each state-supported program that has made a capital expenditure in the hospital facility, to the Department of Health and Human Services, and to the Office of State Budget and Management.

At the meeting to adopt a resolution of intent, the municipality or hospital authority shall request proposals for lease or purchase by direct solicitation of at least five prospective lessees or buyers. The solicitation shall include a copy of

G.S. 131E-13

.

The municipality or hospital authority shall conduct a public hearing on the resolution of intent not less than 15 days after its adoption. Notice of the public hearing shall be given by publication at least 15 days before the hearing. All interested persons shall be heard at the public hearing.

Before considering any proposal to lease or purchase, the municipality or hospital authority shall require information on charges, services, and indigent care at similar facilities owned or operated by the proposed lessee or buyer.

Not less than 45 days after adopting a resolution of intent and not less than 30 days after conducting a public hearing on the resolution of intent, the municipality or hospital authority shall conduct a public hearing on proposals for lease or purchase that have been made. Notice of the public hearings shall be given by publication at least 10 days before the hearing. The notice shall state that copies of proposals for lease or purchase are available to the public.

The municipality or hospital authority shall make copies of the proposals to lease or purchase available to the public at least 10 days before the public hearing on the proposals.

Not less than 60 days after adopting a resolution of intent, the municipality or hospital authority at a regular meeting shall approve any lease, sale, or conveyance by a resolution. The municipality or hospital authority shall adopt this resolution only upon a finding that the lease, sale, or conveyance is in the public interest after considering whether the proposed lease, sale, or conveyance will meet the health-related needs of medically underserved groups, such as low income persons, racial and ethnic minorities, and handicapped persons. Notice of the regular meeting shall be given at least 10 days before the meeting and shall state that copies of the lease, sale, or conveyance proposed for approval are available.

At least 10 days before the regular meeting at which any lease, sale, or conveyance is approved, the municipality or hospital authority shall make copies of the proposed contract available to the public.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section or

G.S. 131E-23

, a hospital authority as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14) or a municipality may lease or sublease hospital land to a corporation or other business entity, whether for profit or not for profit, and may participate as an owner, joint venturer, or other equity participant with a corporation or other business entity for the development, construction, and operation of medical office buildings and other health care or hospital facilities, so long as the municipality, hospital authority, or other entity continues to maintain its primary community general hospital facilities as required by subsection (a) of this section.

A municipality or hospital authority may permit or consent to the pledge of hospital land or leasehold estates in hospital land to facilitate the development, construction, and operation of medical office buildings and other health care or hospital facilities. A municipality or hospital authority also may, as lessee, enter into master leases or agreements to fund for temporary vacancies relating to hospital land or hospital facilities for use in the provision of health care.

Neither

G.S. 153A-176

nor Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes shall apply to leases, subleases, sales, or conveyances under this Chapter.

A municipality or hospital authority that has complied with the requirements of subdivisions (1) through (6) of subsection (d) of this section but has not, following good-faith negotiations, approved any lease, sale, or conveyance as required by subdivisions (7) and (8) of subsection (d) of this section may, not less than 120 days following the public hearing required by subdivision (5) of subsection (d) of this section, solicit additional prospective lessees or buyers not previously solicited as required by subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this section and may approve any lease, sale, or conveyance without the necessity to repeat compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (1) through (6) of subsection (d) of this section, except for the following:

Before considering any proposal to lease or purchase the hospital facility or part thereof, the municipality or hospital authority shall require information on charges, services, and indigent care at similar facilities leased, owned, or operated by the proposed lessee or buyer.

The municipality or hospital authority shall declare its intent to approve any lease or sale in the manner authorized by this subsection at a regular or special meeting held on 10 days’ public notice. Such notice shall state that copies of the lease, sale, or conveyance proposed for approval will be available 10 days prior to the regular or special meeting required by subdivision (3) of this subsection and that the lease, sale, or conveyance shall be considered for approval at a regular or special meeting not less than 10 days following the regular or special meeting required by this subsection. Notice shall be given by publication in one or more papers of general circulation in the affected area describing the intent to lease, sell, or convey the hospital facility involved and the potential buyer or lessee.

Not less than 10 days following the regular or special meeting required by subdivision (2) of this subsection, the municipality or hospital authority shall approve any lease, sale, or conveyance by a resolution at a regular or special meeting.

At least 10 days before the regular or special meeting at which any lease, sale, or conveyance is approved, the municipality or hospital authority shall make copies of the proposed contract available to the public.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1066, s. 1; 1997-233, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2015-288, s. 3.

Local Modification.

(As to the Richmond Memorial Hospital) Richmond: 1993, c. 10, s. 1.

Cross References.

For section regarding sale of hospital facilities to nonprofit corporations, see

G.S. 131E-8

.

§ 131E-14.
Lease or sale of hospital facilities to certain nonprofit corporations.

If a municipality or hospital authority leases, sells, or conveys a hospital facility, or part, to a nonprofit corporation of which a majority of voting members of its governing body is not appointed or controlled by the municipality or hospital authority, the procedural requirements set forth in G.S. 131E-13(d) shall apply.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1066, s. 2.

Cross References.

For section regarding sale of hospital facilities to nonprofit corporations, see

G.S. 131E-8

.

§ 131E-14.1.
Branch facilities.

Notwithstanding anything in this Article, any municipality owning and operating a hospital organized under the provisions of this Part or Part 3 or any nonprofit corporation which leases or operates a hospital facility pursuant to an agreement with the municipality may erect, remodel, enlarge, purchase, finance, and operate branches and related facilities within this State but outside the boundaries of the county subject to the following limitations:

No moneys derived from the exercise by the owning municipality of its power of taxation shall be expended on facilities located outside its boundaries;

No moneys derived from the issuance by the owning municipality of its bonds or notes shall be expended on facilities located outside its boundaries;

The owning municipality shall not possess the power of eminent domain or have the right of condemnation with respect to hospital facilities located outside its boundaries; and

The power conferred on counties by

G.S. 153A-169

and

G.S. 153A-170

to adopt ordinances regulating the use of county-owned property and parking on county-owned property shall not extend to hospital facilities located outside its boundaries unless the board of commissioners of the county in which the facility is located shall by resolution permit any such ordinance to be applicable within its jurisdiction.

, (6) Repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 676, s. 1, effective July 1, 1994.

History.

1983, c. 578, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 676, s. 1.